Alaska, session 34, HB207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 29.60 is amended by adding new sections to read: 05 Article 6A. Fire Station Grant Program. 06 Sec. 29.60.750. Fire station grant program. (a) A matching grant program is 07 established in the department for the purpose of funding fire station construction and 08 renovation. 09 (b) A person in charge of construction or renovation of an eligible fire station 10 may apply to the department for a matching grant under regulations adopted by the 11 department. 12 (c) Subject to appropriation, the department shall award not more than 50 13 percent of the total proposed grant project costs to an eligible applicant. 14 Sec. 29.60.760. Fire station grant fund. (a) The fire station grant fund is 01 established in the department and consists of appropriations to the fund. The 02 legislature may appropriate to the fund income earned on money in the fund. 03 (b) Money appropriated to the fire station grant fund may be expended by the 04 department for fire station construction and renovation matching grants without 05 further appropriation. Money in the fund does not lapse and remains available for 06 expenditure in successive fiscal years. 07 (c) Each fiscal year, the department shall use an amount equal to at least 50 08 percent of the balance of the fire station grant fund on June 30 of the preceding fiscal 09 year for fire station construction and renovation matching grants. 10 Sec. 29.60.770. Regulations. The department may adopt regulations to 11 implement AS 29.60.750 - 29.60.770. 12 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.